Washington statutes.
RCW 10.88.200

Definitions.

Where appearing in this chapter, the term "governor" includes any person performing the functions of governor by authority of the law of this state. The term "executive authority" includes the governor, and any person performing the functions of governor in a state other than this state, and the term "state" referring to a state other than this state refers to any other state, or the District of Columbia, or territory organized or unorganized of the United States of America.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 46 s 1.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: Throughout this chapter, the phrase "this act" has been changed to "this chapter." This act [1971 ex.s. c 46] consists of this chapter, the 1971 amendment of RCW 26.21.050, and the repeal of RCW 10.88.010 through 10.88.060.